Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-502.05
Life insurance; annuity policy; return; when.

Every individual life insurance or annuity policy, except a credit life policy, shall have printed on its face or attached to the policy a notice stating in substance that the person to whom the policy is issued shall be permitted to return the policy within ten days of its delivery to the purchaser and to have the premium paid refunded if, after examination of the policy, the purchaser is not satisfied with it for any reason. If a policyholder or a purchaser pursuant to such notice returns the policy to the insurer at its home office or branch office or to the agent or agency through which it was purchased, the policy shall be void from the beginning and the parties shall be in the same position as if no policy had been issued.

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 128.